Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.470

Depositaries for revolving fund—Deposits.

The director or his or her designee shall designate financial institutions which are qualified public depositaries under chapter 39.58 RCW as depositary or depositaries of money received for the marketing act revolving fund. All moneys received by the director or his or her designee or by any administrator, board or employee, except an amount of petty cash for each day's needs as fixed by the regulations, shall be deposited each day in a designated depositary.

[ 1987 c 393 s 8; 1961 c 256 s 47.]